src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection for Võro
! ------------------------
!LEXICON N_ !!= * @CODE@ Lacks specific continuation lexicon
!+N+WORK: #;

LEXICON N_1HANS1A !!= @CODE@ 1 hanśa:hanśa
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_1HANS1A-SG ;
        N_1HANS1A_PL ;

LEXICON N_1HANS1A-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_1HANS1A-SG ;
LEXICON N_1HANS1A_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_1HANS1A_PL ;

LEXICON N_1VIU !!= @CODE@ 1 viu:viu
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_1VIU-SG ;
 N_1VIU_PL ;

LEXICON N_1VIU-SG
:%{back%} NMN_1VIU-SG ; 
LEXICON N_1VIU_PL
:%{back%} NMN_1VIU_PL ; 


LEXICON N_1HERRAE !!= @CODE@ 1 herrä:herrä
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_1HERRAE-SG ;
 N_1HERRAE_PL ;

LEXICON N_1HERRAE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_1HERRAE-SG ; 
LEXICON N_1HERRAE_PL
:%{front%} NMN_1HERRAE_PL ; 

LEXICON N_1PREI !!= @CODE@ 1 prei:prei
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_1PREI-SG ;
 N_1PREI_PL ;

LEXICON N_1PREI-SG
:%{front%} NMN_1PREI-SG ; 
LEXICON N_1PREI_PL
:%{front%} NMN_1PREI_PL ; 

LEXICON N_2ARTIKLI
!! * Yaml: **suhvli**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_2ARTIKLI-SG ;
   N_2ARTIKLI_PL ;

LEXICON N_2ARTIKLI-SG
:%{back%} NMN_2ARTIKLI-SG ;
LEXICON N_2ARTIKLI_PL
:%{back%} NMN_2ARTIKLI_PL ;


LEXICON N_2KERGE
!! * Yaml: **kerge**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_2KERGE-SG ;
   N_2KERGE_PL ;

LEXICON N_2KERGE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_2KERGE-SG ;
LEXICON N_2KERGE_PL
:%{front%} NMN_2KERGE_PL ;


LEXICON N_3PERAEDUE !!= @CODE@ perädü:perädü
!! * Yaml: **peraedue**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_3PERAEDUE-SG ;
   N_3PERAEDUE_PL ;

LEXICON N_3PERAEDUE-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_3PERAEDUE-SG ;
LEXICON N_3PERAEDUE_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_3PERAEDUE_PL ;

LEXICON N_3ALADU !!= @CODE@ aladu:aladu
!! * Yaml: **peraedue**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_3ALADU-SG ;
   N_3ALADU_PL ;

LEXICON N_3ALADU-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_3ALADU-SG ;
LEXICON N_3ALADU_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_3ALADU_PL ;


LEXICON N_4TERVUES
!! * Yaml: **tervues**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_4TERVUES-SG ;
   N_4TERVUES_PL ;
LEXICON N_4TERVUES-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_4TERVUES-SG ;
LEXICON N_4TERVUES_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_4TERVUES_PL ;

LEXICON N_4AINUS
!! * Yaml: **A-ainus**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_4AINUS-SG ;
   N_4AINUS_PL ;
LEXICON N_4AINUS-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_4AINUS-SG ;
LEXICON N_4AINUS_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_4AINUS_PL ;


LEXICON N_5OPPAJA
!! * Yaml: **N-oppaja5**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_5OPPAJA-SG ;
   N_5OPPAJA_PL ;

LEXICON N_5OPPAJA-SG
:%{back%} NMN_5OPPAJA/MAENGJAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_5OPPAJA_PL
:%{back%} NMN_5OPPAJA/MAENGJAE_PL ;

LEXICON N_5MAENGJAE
!! * Yaml: **N-mängjä5**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_5MAENGJAE-SG ;
   N_5MAENGJAE_PL ;

LEXICON N_5MAENGJAE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_5OPPAJA/MAENGJAE-SG ;
LEXICON N_5MAENGJAE_PL
:%{front%} NMN_5OPPAJA/MAENGJAE_PL ;

LEXICON N_6MAKW
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_6MAKW-SG ;
 N_6MAKW_PL ;
LEXICON N_6MAKW-SG
:%{back%} NMN_6MAKW/HELLE-SG ;
LEXICON N_6MAKW_PL
:%{back%} NMN_6MAKW/HELLE_PL ;

!LEXICON N_6HELLE
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
! N_6HELLE-SG ;
! N_6HELLE_PL ;

!LEXICON N_6HELLE-SG
!:%{front%} NMN_6MAKW/HELLE-SG ;
!LEXICON N_6HELLE_PL
!:%{front%} NMN_6MAKW/HELLE_PL ;

LEXICON N_7FUEUESIGA !füüsiga:füüsi%{kg%}a
!! * Yaml: **fueuesiga**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_7FUEUESIGA-SG ;
   N_7FUEUESIGA_PL ;

LEXICON N_7FUEUESIGA-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_7FUEUESIGA-SG ;
LEXICON N_7FUEUESIGA_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_7FUEUESIGA_PL ;

LEXICON N_8KASK
:%^VowRM ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_8KASK-SG ;
 N_8KASK_PL ;
LEXICON N_8KASK-SG
:%{back%} NMN_8KASK/HAEIELM-SG ;
LEXICON N_8KASK_PL
:%{back%} NMN_8KASK/HAEIELM_PL ;

LEXICON N_8AASTAK
 N_8AASTAK-SG ;
 N_8AASTAK_PL ;
LEXICON N_8AASTAK-SG
:%{back%} NMN_8AASTAK-SG ;
LEXICON N_8AASTAK_PL
:%{back%} NMN_8AASTAK_PL ;

LEXICON N_8SADANG
:%^VowRM ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_8SADANG-SG ;
 N_8SADANG_PL ;
LEXICON N_8SADANG-SG
:%{back%} NMN_8SADANG-SG ;
LEXICON N_8SADANG_PL
:%{back%} NMN_8SADANG_PL ;

LEXICON N_8KULDNW
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_8KULDNW-SG ;
 N_8KULDNW_PL ;
LEXICON N_8KULDNW-SG
:%{back%} NMN_8KULDNW/KIIL1NE-SG ;
LEXICON N_8KULDNW_PL
:%{back%} NMN_8KULDNW/KIIL1NE_PL ;

LEXICON N_8DOLLAR1
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_8DOLLAR1-SG ;
 N_8DOLLAR1_PL ;
LEXICON N_8DOLLAR1-SG
:%{back%} NMN_8DOLLAR1/EEDER1-SG ;
LEXICON N_8DOLLAR1_PL
:%{back%} NMN_8DOLLAR1/EEDER1_PL ;

LEXICON N_8EEDER1
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_8EEDER1-SG ;
 N_8EEDER1_PL ;
LEXICON N_8EEDER1-SG
:%{front%} NMN_8DOLLAR1/EEDER1-SG ;
LEXICON N_8EEDER1_PL
:%{front%} NMN_8DOLLAR1/EEDER1_PL ;


LEXICON N_8HAEIELM
:%^VowRM ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_8HAEIELM-SG ;
 N_8HAEIELM_PL ;
LEXICON N_8HAEIELM-SG
:%{front%} NMN_8KASK/HAEIELM-SG ;
LEXICON N_8HAEIELM_PL
:%{front%} NMN_8KASK/HAEIELM_PL ;

LEXICON N_8TUHAT ! tuhat+N:tuha
:%^VowRM ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_8TUHAT-SG ;
 N_8TUHAT_PL ;
LEXICON N_8TUHAT-SG
:%{back%} NMN_8TUHAT-SG ;
LEXICON N_8TUHAT_PL
:%{back%} NMN_8TUHAT_PL ;

LEXICON N_9KIPWN1
!! kipõń:kipõn
!! * Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_9KIPWN1-SG ;
   N_9KIPWN1_PL ;
LEXICON N_9KIPWN1-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_9KIPWN1/VETEL1-SG ;
LEXICON N_9KIPWN1_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_9KIPWN1/VETEL1_PL ;

LEXICON N_9ALLAS1
!! allaś:allas
!! * Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_9ALLAS1-SG ;
   N_9ALLAS1_PL ;
LEXICON N_9ALLAS1-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_9ALLAS1/SINNEL1-SG ;
LEXICON N_9ALLAS1_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_9ALLAS1/SINNEL1_PL ;

LEXICON N_9SINNEL1
!! sinneĺ:sinnel
!! * Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_9SINNEL1-SG ;
   N_9SINNEL1_PL ;
LEXICON N_9SINNEL1-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_9ALLAS1/SINNEL1-SG ;
LEXICON N_9SINNEL1_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_9ALLAS1/SINNEL1_PL ;

LEXICON N_9VETEL1
!! veteĺ:vetel
!! * Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_9VETEL1-SG ;
   N_9VETEL1_PL ;

LEXICON N_9VETEL1-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_9KIPWN1/VETEL1-SG ;
LEXICON N_9VETEL1_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_9KIPWN1/VETEL1_PL ;

LEXICON N_9TUKWV
!! tukõv:tukõv
!! * Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_9TUKWV-SG ;
   N_9TUKWV_PL ;
LEXICON N_9TUKWV-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_9TUKWV/VERREV-SG ;
LEXICON N_9TUKWV_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_9TUKWV/VERREV_PL ;

LEXICON N_9VERREV
!! verrev:verrev
!! * Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_9VERREV-SG ;
   N_9VERREV_PL ;
LEXICON N_9VERREV-SG
:%{front%} NMN_9TUKWV/VERREV-SG ;
LEXICON N_9VERREV_PL
:%{front%} NMN_9TUKWV/VERREV_PL ;

LEXICON N_9SALLAI
!! sallai:sallai
!! * Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_9SALLAI-SG ;
   N_9SALLAI_PL ;
LEXICON N_9SALLAI-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_9SALLAI/ELLAEI-SG ;
LEXICON N_9SALLAI_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_9SALLAI/ELLAEI_PL ;

LEXICON N_9ELLAEI
!! elläi:elläi
!! * Yaml: **N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_9ELLAEI-SG ;
   N_9ELLAEI_PL ;
LEXICON N_9ELLAEI-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_9SALLAI/ELLAEI-SG ;
LEXICON N_9ELLAEI_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_9SALLAI/ELLAEI_PL ;

!LEXICON N_9TAHHE
!!! tahhe:tahhe
!!! * Yaml:__ N-kipwnj9__
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
!   N_9TAHHE-SG ;
!   N_9TAHHE_PL ;

!LEXICON N_9TAHHE-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_9TAHHE/HERRE-SG ;
!LEXICON N_9TAHHE_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_9TAHHE/HERRE_PL ;

LEXICON N_9HERRE
!! herre:herre
!! * Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_9HERRE-SG ;
   N_9HERRE_PL ;
LEXICON N_9HERRE-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_9TAHHE/HERRE-SG ;
LEXICON N_9HERRE_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_9TAHHE/HERRE_PL ;

LEXICON N_9VILLW
!! villõ:villõ
!! * Yaml:**N-kipwnj9**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
   N_9VILLW-SG ;
   N_9VILLW_PL ;
LEXICON N_9VILLW-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_9VILLW/XX-SG ;
