src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
teksaq+N:teksa N_1HANS1A_PL "_#, #t_" ;
kile+N:kile N_1HERRAE "_#, #t__kile_" ;
krae+N:krae N_1VIU "_#, #d__krae_" ;
kriimo+N:kriimo N_1HANS1A "_#, #t__kriimo_" ;
kräo+N:kräo N_1VIU "_#, #d__kräo_" ;
nähkä+N:nähkä N_1HERRAE "_#, #t__nähkä_" ;
osśo+N:osśo N_1HANS1A "_#, #t__osśo_" ;
prei+N:prei N_1PREI "_#, #d__prei_" ;
rae+N:rae N_1VIU "_#, #d__rae_" ;
tohńa+N:tohńa N_1HANS1A "_#, #t__tohńa_" ;
tähistü+N:tähistü N_1HERRAE "_#, #t__tähistü_" ;
müübli+N:müübli N_2KERGE ;
kortli+N:%{ˋØ%}#kortli N_2ARTIKLI "_#, #t__ˋkortli_" ;
lasõŕtrükli+N:lasõŕ%{ˋØ%}trükli N_2KERGE "_#, #t__lasõŕ%{ˋØ%}trükli_" ;
naabri+N:%{ˋØ%}#naabri N_2ARTIKLI "_#, #t__ˋnaabri_" ;
perserihkli+N:ˋ#perse%{ˋØ%}rihkli N_2KERGE "_#, #t__ˋperse%{ˋØ%}rihkli_" ;
tiidrü+N:ti̬i̬drü N_2KERGE "_#, #t__ti̬i̬drü_" ;
tiuhkri+N:%{ˋØ%}#tiuhkri N_2ARTIKLI "_#, #t__ˋtiuhkri_" ;
ilõdu+N:ilõdu N_3ALADU "_#du, #tut __ilõ|du_" ;
marudu+N:marudu N_3ALADU "_#du, #tut__maru|du_" ;
meeledü+N:meeledü N_3PERAEDUE "_#dü, #tüt__meele|dü_" ;
närvädü+N:närvädü N_3PERAEDUE "_#dü, #tüt__närvä|dü_" ;
õnnõdu+N:õ̭nnõdu N_3ALADU "_#du, #tut__õ̭nnõ|du_" ;
ärädü+N:ärädü N_3PERAEDUE "_#dü, #tüt__ärä|dü_" ;
kelmüs+N:%{ˋØ%}#kelmüs N_4TERVUES "_#, #t__ˋkelmü|s_" ;
lakjus+N:%{ˋØ%}#lakjus N_4AINUS "_#, #t__ˋlakju|s_" ;
läütüs+N:%{ˋØ%}#läütüs N_4TERVUES "_#, #t__ˋläütü|s_" ;
parrus+N:%{ˋØ%}#parrus N_4AINUS "_#, #t__ˋparru|s_" ;
sund́us+N:%{ˋØ%}#sund́us N_4AINUS "_#, #t__ˋsund́u|s_" ;
tehnüs+N:%{ˋØ%}#tehnüs N_4TERVUES "_#, #t__ˋtehnü|s_" ;
kaabli+N:%{ˋØ%}#kaabli N_5OPPAJA "_#, #t__ˋkaabli_" ;
kasvosüüjä+N:kasvosü̬ü̬jä N_5MAENGJAE "_#, #t__kasvosü̬ü̬jä_" ;
mulksna+N:%{ˋØ%}#mulksna N_5OPPAJA "_#, #t__ˋmulksna_" ;
müüjä+N:%{ˋØ%}#müüjä N_5MAENGJAE "_#, #t__ˋmüüjä_" ;
saaristo+N:saaristo N_5OPPAJA "_#, #t__saaristo_" ;
juudihõpõ+N:juudihõ%{pØ%}põ N_6MAKW "_#, #t__juudihõpõ_" ;
lipõ+N:li%{pØ%}põ N_6MAKW "_#, #t__lipõ_" ;
tsagõhõq+N:tsagõhõq N_6MAKW_PL "_#idõ, #it__tsagõh|õq_" ;
tsakõq+N:tsa%{kØ%}kõ N_6MAKW_PL "_#kkidõ #gõhidõ, #kkit #gõhit__tsa|kõq_" ;
matõmaatiga+N:matõmaati%{kg%}a N_7FUEUESIGA "_#ga, #kat__matõmaati|ga_" ;
tehniga+N:tehni%{kg%}a N_7FUEUESIGA "_#, #t__tehniga_" ;
hüväpuulnõ+N:hüvä%{ˋØ%}puul N_8KULDNW "_#sõ, #sõt__hüvä%{ˋØ%}puul|nõ_" ;
kortin+N:%{ˋØ%}#kortina N_8KASK "_#a, #at__ˋkortin_" ;
kuvõŕ+N:kuvõri N_8DOLLAR1 "_#i, #it__kuvõŕ_" ;
leidünǵ+N:leidüngi N_8EEDER1 "_#i, #it__leidünǵ_" ;
mõlõmbaq+N:mõlõmba N_8KASK "_#idõ, #it__mõlõmb|aq_" ;
nõdõrm+N:nõdõrmu N_8SADANG "_#u, #t__nõdõrm_" ;
nädserm+N:nädsermä N_8HAEIELM "_#ä, #ät__nädserm_" ;
nühräsḱ+N:nühräs%{kḱ%}i N_8EEDER1 "_#i, #it__nühräsḱ_" ;
plahkaḿ+N:%{ˋØ%}#plahka%{mḿ%}i N_8DOLLAR1 "_#i, #it__ˋplahkaḿ_" ;
rassõjalgnõ+N:rassõ%{ˋØ%}jalg N_8KULDNW "_#sõ, #sõt__rassõ%{ˋØ%}jalg|nõ_" ;
sunning+N:sunningu N_8SADANG "_#u, #ut__sunning_" ;
virtin+N:%{ˋØ%}#virtinä N_8HAEIELM "_#ä, #ät__ˋvirtin_" ;
juudihõpõ+N:juudihõ%{pb%}õ N_9VILLW "_#bõhõ, #bõhõt__juudihõ|põ_" ;
kivitsakai+N:kivitsa%{kg%}a%{ij%} N_9SALLAI "_#gaja, #gajat__kivitsa|kai_" ;
kodoelläi+N:kodoe%{lØ%}lä%{ij%} N_9ELLAEI "_#äjä, #äjät __kodoel|läi_" ;
kurrin+N:ku%{rØ%}rin N_9TUKWV "_#ina, #inat__kur|rin_" ;
lipõ+N:li%{pb%}õ N_9VILLW "_#bõhõ, #libõht__li|põ_" ;
lunt́küpäŕ+N:lunt́küpä%{rŕ%} N_9VETEL1 "_#bärä, #bärät__lunt́kü|päŕ_" ;
marrań+N:ma%{rØ%}ra%{nń%} N_9KIPWN1 "_#ana, #anat__mar|rań_" ;
mühhin+N:mü%{hØ%}hin N_9VERREV "_#inä, #inät__müh|hin_" ;
pitaĺ+N:pi%{td%}a%{lĺ%} N_9ALLAS1 "_#dali, #dalit__pi|taĺ_" ;
porrin+N:po%{rØ%}rin N_9TUKWV "_#ina, #inat__por|rin_" ;
pütäĺ+N:pü%{td%}ä%{lĺ%} N_9VETEL1 "_#dälä, #dälät__pü|täĺ_" ;
rapai+N:ra%{pb%}a%{ij%} N_9SALLAI "_#baja, #bajat__ra|pai_" ;
räpäĺ+N:rä%{pb%}ä%{lĺ%} N_9SINNEL1 "_#i, #it__rä|päĺ_" ;
sitavitäi+N:sitavi%{td%}ä%{ij%} N_9ELLAEI "_#däjä, #däjät__sitavi|täi_" ;
tannoḿ+N:ta%{nØ%}no%{mḿ%} N_9KIPWN1 "_#oma, #omat__tan|noḿ_" ;
tekij+N:te%{kg%}ij N_9VERREV  "_#gijä, #gijät__te|kij_" ;
tsäpe+N:tsä%{pb%}e N_9HERRE "_#behe, #behet__tsä|pe_" ;
vatõŕ+N:va%{td%}õ%{rŕ%} N_9ALLAS1 "_#dõri #dõra, #dõrit #dõrat__va|tõŕ_" ;
ätäĺ+N:ä%{td%}ä%{lĺ%} N_9SINNEL1 "_ädä%{lĺ%}i ädälä, ädälit ädälät__ätäĺ_" ;
